Wisconsin, session 2025, SB218.
do enact as follows:SB218,11Section 1. 16.967 (7) (am) 2. of the statutes is amended to read:SB218,2,6216.967 (7) (am) 2. The minimum amount of a grant under this paragraph is 3determined by subtracting the amount of fees that the county retained under s. 459.72 (5) (b) in the preceding fiscal year from $100,000 $175,000. The department 5is not required to award a grant to a county that retained at least $100,000 6$175,000 in fees under s. 59.72 (5) (b) in the preceding fiscal year.SB218,27Section 2. 16.967 (7) (b) of the statutes is amended to read:SB218,3,4816.967 (7) (b) In addition to any other grant received awarded under this 1subsection, the department may award a grant to any county in an amount not less 2than $1,000 $5,000 per year to be used for the training and education of county 3employees for the design, development, and implementation of a land information 4system.SB218,35Section 3. 16.967 (7) (c) of the statutes is created to read:SB218,3,11616.967 (7) (c) In addition to any other grant awarded under this subsection, 7the department shall award local government contribution based grants to 8counties, for the purposes specified under par. (am), to fully distribute 46 percent of 9the amounts received by the department under s. 77.24 (2) (b) in each fiscal year. 10The department shall determine the amount of a grant awarded to a county as 11follows:SB218,3,13121. Determine the total amount of moneys received by the department under s. 1377.24 (2) (b) in the preceding fiscal year.SB218,3,15142. Determine the total amount of moneys received by the department under s. 1577.24 (2) (b) in the preceding fiscal year that were collected by the county.SB218,3,17163. Divide the amount determined under subd. 2. by the amount determined 17under subd. 1.SB218,3,18184. Multiply the amount determined under subd. 1. by 46 percent.SB218,3,19195. Multiply the quotient under subd. 3. by the product under subd. 4.SB218,420Section 4. 20.505 (1) (uc) of the statutes is amended to read:SB218,3,242120.505 (1) (uc) Land information program; local aids. From the land 22information fund, all moneys received by the department under s. ss. 59.72 (5) (a) 23and 77.24 (2) (b), except moneys appropriated under par. (ub), for aids to counties 24under s. 16.967 (7).SB218,51Section 5. 25.55 of the statutes is amended to read:SB218,4,4225.55 Land information fund. There is created a separate nonlapsible 3trust fund designated as the land information fund, consisting of moneys received 4under s. ss. 59.72 (5) (a) and 77.24 (2) (b).SB218,65Section 6. 59.43 (13) of the statutes is created to read:SB218,4,13659.43 (13) Real property recording notification system. A county that 7retains moneys under s. 77.24 shall establish a real property recording notification 8system to be administered by the register of deeds. Upon application by a person, 9the system shall monitor publicly recorded real property records for activity and 10changes related to properties owned by a specific person or a specific property, and, 11upon the recording of a new document against a monitored property, notify the 12applicant. No fee may be charged to an applicant for application, monitoring, or 13notification under a system established under this subsection.SB218,714Section 7. 77.22 (1) of the statutes is amended to read:SB218,5,91577.22 (1) There is imposed on the grantor of real estate a real estate transfer 16fee at the rate of 30 20 cents for each $100 of value or fraction thereof on every 17conveyance not exempted or excluded under this subchapter. In regard to land 18contracts, the value is the total principal amount that the buyer agrees to pay the 19seller for the real estate. This fee shall be collected by the register at the time the 20instrument of conveyance is submitted for recording. Except as provided in s. 2177.255, at the time of submission the grantee or his or her duly authorized agent or 22other person acquiring an ownership interest under the instrument, or the 23judgment creditor in the case of a foreclosure under s. 846.16, shall execute a 24return, signed by both grantor and grantee, on the form prescribed under sub. (2). 1The register shall enter the fee paid on the face of the deed or other instrument of 2conveyance before recording, and, except as provided in s. 77.255, submission of a 3completed real estate transfer return and collection by the register of the fee shall 4be prerequisites to acceptance of the conveyance for recording. The register shall 5have no duty to determine either the correct value of the real estate transferred or 6the validity of any exemption or exclusion claimed. If the transfer is not subject to a 7fee as provided in this subchapter, the reason for exemption shall be stated on the 8face of the conveyance to be recorded by reference to the proper subsection under s. 977.25.SB218,810Section 8. 77.24 of the statutes is renumbered 77.24 (1) and amended to 11read:SB218,5,141277.24 (1) Twenty Fifty percent of all fees collected under this subchapter shall 13be retained by the county and the balance shall be transmitted to the state as 14provided in sub. (2).SB218,5,1815(3) Remittances shall be made monthly by the county treasurers to the 16department of revenue by the 15th day of the month following the close of the month 17in which the fee was collected. The remittance to the department shall be 18accompanied by the returns executed under s. 77.22.SB218,919Section 9. 77.24 (2) of the statutes is created to read:SB218,5,212077.24 (2) (a) Thirty percent of all fees collected under this subchapter shall be 21deposited into the general fund.SB218,5,2322(b) Twenty percent of all fees collected under this subchapter shall be 23deposited into the land information fund.SB218,101Section 10. Initial applicability.SB218,6,32(1) This act first applies to conveyances filed on the effective date of this 3subsection.SB218,114Section 11. Effective date.SB218,6,55(1) This act takes effect on the 30th day after the day of publication.SB218,6,66